Florida, session 2026, SB1280.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 110 111 Section 1.âSection 741.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to 112 read: 113 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 114 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 115 injunction; issuance of injunction; Statewide Injunction 116 Verification System; enforcement; public records exemption.â 117 (1)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 118 for protection against domestic violence. 119 (a)âAny person described in paragraph (e), who is either 120 the victim of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 or has 121 reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of 122 becoming the victim of any act of domestic violence, has 123 standing in the circuit court to file a verified petition for an 124 injunction for protection against domestic violence. 125 (b)âThis cause of action for an injunction may be sought 126 whether or not any other cause of action is currently pending 127 between the parties. However, the pendency of any such cause of 128 action shall be alleged in the petition. 129 (c)âIn the event a subsequent cause of action is filed 130 under chapter 61, any orders entered therein shall take 131 precedence over any inconsistent provisions of an injunction 132 issued under this section which addresses matters governed by 133 chapter 61. 134 (d)âA personâs right to petition for an injunction shall 135 not be affected by such person having left a residence or 136 household to avoid domestic violence. 137 (e)âThis cause of action for an injunction may be sought by 138 family or household members. No person shall be precluded from 139 seeking injunctive relief pursuant to this chapter solely on the 140 basis that such person is not a spouse. 141 (f)âThis cause of action for an injunction shall not 142 require that either party be represented by an attorney. 143 (g)âAny person, including an officer of the court, who 144 offers evidence or recommendations relating to the cause of 145 action must either present the evidence or recommendations in 146 writing to the court with copies to each party and their 147 attorney, or must present the evidence under oath at a hearing 148 at which all parties are present. 149 (h)âNothing in this section shall affect the title to any 150 real estate. 151 (i)âThe court is prohibited from issuing mutual orders of 152 protection. This does not preclude the court from issuing 153 separate injunctions for protection against domestic violence 154 where each party has complied with the provisions of this 155 section. Compliance with the provisions of this section cannot 156 be waived. 157 (j)âNotwithstanding any provision of chapter 47, a petition 158 for an injunction for protection against domestic violence may 159 be filed in the circuit where the petitioner currently or 160 temporarily resides, where the respondent resides, or where the 161 domestic violence occurred. There is no minimum requirement of 162 residency to petition for an injunction for protection. 163 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the assessment of a 164 filing fee for a petition for protection against domestic 165 violence is prohibited. However, subject to legislative 166 appropriation, the clerk of the circuit court may, on a 167 quarterly basis, submit to the Justice Administrative Commission 168 a certified request for reimbursement for petitions for 169 protection against domestic violence issued by the court, at the 170 rate of $40 per petition. The request for reimbursement must be 171 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice 172 Administrative Commission. From this reimbursement, the clerk 173 shall pay any law enforcement agency serving the injunction the 174 fee requested by the law enforcement agency; however, this fee 175 may not exceed $20. 176 (b)âNo bond shall be required by the court for the entry of 177 an injunction. 178 (c)1.âThe clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in 179 seeking both injunctions for protection against domestic 180 violence and enforcement for a violation thereof as specified in 181 this section. 182 2.âAll clerksâ offices shall provide simplified petition 183 forms for the injunction, any motion for modifications, any 184 motion for and the enforcement thereof, and a designation of 185 mailing and e-mail addresses for service, including instructions 186 for completion. 187 3.âThe clerk of the court shall advise petitioners of the 188 opportunity to apply for a certificate of indigence in lieu of 189 prepayment for the cost of the filing fee, as provided in 190 paragraph (a). 191 4.âThe clerk of the court shall ensure the petitionerâs 192 privacy to the extent practical while completing the forms for 193 injunctions for protection against domestic violence. 194 5.âThe clerk of the court shall provide petitioners with a 195 minimum of two certified copies of the order of the temporary 196 injunction, one of which is serviceable and will inform the 197 petitioner of the process for service and enforcement. 198 6.âClerks of court and appropriate staff in each county 199 shall receive training in the effective assistance of 200 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association 201 of Court Clerks. 202 7.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall make 203 available informational brochures on domestic violence when such 204 brochures are provided by local certified domestic violence 205 centers. 206 8.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall distribute a 207 statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the 208 time of filing for an injunction for protection against domestic 209 or repeat violence when such brochures become available. The 210 brochure must include information about the effect of giving the 211 court false information about domestic violence. 212 (3)(a)âThe verified petition must allege the existence of 213 such domestic violence and must include the specific facts and 214 circumstances upon the basis of which relief is sought. 215 (b)âThe verified petition shall be in substantially the 216 following form: 217 218 PETITION FOR 219 INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 220 AGAINST DOMESTIC VIOLENCE 221 222 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under penalties 223 of perjury that the following statements are true: 224 (a)âPetitioner resides at: ...(address)... 225 (Petitioner may furnish address to the court in a separate 226 confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the petitioner 227 requires the location of the current residence to be 228 confidential.) 229 (b)âRespondent resides at: ...(last known address)... 230 (c)âRespondentâs last known place of employment: ...(name 231 of business and address)... 232 (d)âPhysical description of respondent:.................. 233 Race........ 234 Sex........ 235 Date of birth........ 236 Height........ 237 Weight........ 238 Eye color........ 239 Hair color........ 240 Distinguishing marks or scars........ 241 (e)âAliases of respondent:............................... 242 (f)âRespondent is the spouse or former spouse of the 243 petitioner or is any other person related by blood or marriage 244 to the petitioner or is any other person who is or was residing 245 within a single dwelling unit with the petitioner, as if a 246 family, or is a person with whom the petitioner has a child in 247 common, regardless of whether the petitioner and respondent are 248 or were married or residing together, as if a family. 249 (g)âThe following describes any other cause of action 250 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent:........ 251 ................................................................ 252 The petitioner should also describe any previous or pending 253 attempts by the petitioner to obtain an injunction for 254 protection against domestic violence in this or any other 255 circuit, and the results of that attempt:....................... 256 ................................................................ 257 Case numbers should be included if available. 258 (h)âPetitioner is either a victim of domestic violence or 259 has reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger 260 of becoming a victim of domestic violence because respondent 261 has: ...(mark all sections that apply and describe in the spaces 262 below the incidents of violence or threats of violence, 263 specifying when and where they occurred, including, but not 264 limited to, locations such as a home, school, place of 265 employment, or visitation exchange)... 266 ......................................................... 267 ......................................................... 268 ....committed or threatened to commit domestic violence 269 defined in s. 741.28, Florida Statutes, as any assault, 270 aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, 271 sexual battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false 272 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical 273 injury or death of one family or household member by another. 274 With the exception of persons who are parents of a child in 275 common, the family or household members must be currently 276 residing or have in the past resided together in the same single 277 dwelling unit. 278 ....previously threatened, harassed, stalked, or physically 279 abused the petitioner. 280 ....attempted to harm the petitioner or family members or 281 individuals closely associated with the petitioner. 282 ....threatened to conceal, kidnap, or harm the petitionerâs 283 child or children. 284 ....intentionally injured or killed a family pet. 285 ....used, or has threatened to use, against the petitioner 286 any weapons such as guns or knives. 287 ....physically restrained the petitioner from leaving the 288 home or calling law enforcement. 289 ....a criminal history involving violence or the threat of 290 violence (if known). 291 ....another order of protection issued against him or her 292 previously or from another jurisdiction (if known). 293 ....destroyed personal property, including, but not limited 294 to, telephones or other communication equipment, clothing, or 295 other items belonging to the petitioner. 296 ....engaged in a pattern of abusive, threatening, 297 intimidating, or controlling behavior composed of a series of 298 acts over a period of time, however short. 299 ....engaged in any other behavior or conduct that leads the 300 petitioner to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in 301 imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. 302 (i)âPetitioner alleges the following additional specific 303 facts: ...(mark appropriate sections)... 304 ....A minor child or minor children reside with the 305 petitioner whose names and ages are as follows: 306 307 ....Petitioner needs the exclusive use and possession of 308 the dwelling that the parties share. 309 ....Petitioner is unable to obtain safe alternative housing 310 because: 311 312 ....Petitioner genuinely fears that respondent imminently 313 will abuse, remove, or hide the minor child or children from 314 petitioner because: 315 316 (j)âPetitioner genuinely fears imminent domestic violence 317 by respondent. 318 (k)âPetitioner seeks an injunction: ...(mark appropriate 319 section or sections)... 320 ....Immediately restraining the respondent from committing 321 any acts of domestic violence. 322 ....Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of 323 domestic violence. 324 ....Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use 325 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or 326 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 327 ....Providing a temporary parenting plan, including a 328 temporary time-sharing schedule, with regard to the minor child 329 or children of the parties which might involve prohibiting or 330 limiting time-sharing or requiring that it be supervised by a 331 third party. 332 ....Designating that the exchange of the minor child or 333 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 334 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 335 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if 336 temporary time-sharing of the child is awarded to the 337 respondent. 338 ....Establishing temporary support for the minor child or 339 children or the petitioner. 340 ....Directing the respondent to participate in a batterersâ 341 intervention program. 342 ....Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the 343 protection of a victim of domestic violence, or any minor 344 children of the victim, including any injunctions or directives 345 to law enforcement agencies. 346 347 (c)âEvery petition for an injunction against domestic 348 violence must contain, directly above the signature line, a 349 statement in all capital letters and bold type not smaller than 350 the surrounding text, as follows: 351 352 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ 353 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT 354 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN 355 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF 356 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, 357 FLORIDA STATUTES. 358 359 ...(initials)... 360 361 (d)âIf the verified petition seeks to determine a parenting 362 plan and time-sharing schedule with regard to the minor child or 363 children of the parties, the verified petition must be 364 accompanied by or must incorporate the allegations required by 365 s. 61.522 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and 366 Enforcement Act. 367 (4)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall review 368 the petition ex parte. The court must set a final hearing to be 369 held at the earliest possible time if it appears the petitioner 370 is a victim of domestic violence or has reasonable cause to 371 believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of 372 domestic violence. If a final hearing is set, the respondent 373 must shall be personally served by a law enforcement officer 374 with a copy of the petition, financial affidavit, Uniform Child 375 Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act affidavit, if any, 376 notice of final hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, 377 before prior to the final hearing. 378 (5)(a)âUpon review of the petition, if it appears to the 379 court that an immediate and present danger of domestic violence 380 exists, the court may grant a temporary injunction ex parte, 381 pending a final full hearing, and may grant such relief as the 382 court deems proper, including an injunction: 383 1.âRestraining the respondent from committing any acts of 384 domestic violence. 385 2.âAwarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use 386 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or 387 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 388 3.âOn the same basis as provided in s. 61.13, providing the 389 petitioner a temporary parenting plan, including a time-sharing 390 schedule, which may award the petitioner up to 100 percent of 391 the time-sharing. If temporary time-sharing is awarded to the 392 respondent, the exchange of the child must occur at a neutral 393 safe exchange location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location 394 authorized by a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 395 753.01 if the court determines it is in the best interests of 396 the child after consideration of all of the factors specified in 397 s. 61.13(3). The temporary parenting plan remains in effect 398 until the order expires or an order is entered by a court of 399 competent jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action 400 or proceeding affecting the placement of, access to, parental 401 time with, adoption of, or parental rights and responsibilities 402 for the minor child. 403 4.âIf the petitioner and respondent have an existing 404 parenting plan or time-sharing schedule under another court 405 order, designating that the exchange of the minor child or 406 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 407 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 408 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if the 409 court determines it is in the best interests of the child after 410 consideration of all of the factors specified in s. 61.13(3). 411 5.âAwarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive care, 412 possession, or control of an animal that is owned, possessed, 413 harbored, kept, or held by the petitioner, the respondent, or a 414 minor child residing in the residence or household of the 415 petitioner or respondent. The court may order the respondent to 416 temporarily have no contact with the animal and prohibit the 417 respondent from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 418 harming, or otherwise disposing of the animal. This subparagraph 419 does not apply to an animal owned primarily for a bona fide 420 agricultural purpose, as defined under s. 193.461, or to a 421 service animal, as defined under s. 413.08, if the respondent is 422 the service animalâs handler. 423 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in an ex parte review 424 or an a hearing ex parte hearing for the purpose of obtaining 425 such ex parte temporary injunction, no evidence other than 426 verified pleadings or affidavits shall be used as evidence, 427 unless the respondent appears at the hearing or has received 428 reasonable notice of the hearing. A denial of a petition for an 429 ex parte temporary injunction shall be by written order noting 430 the legal grounds for denial. When the only ground for denial is 431 no appearance of an immediate and present danger of domestic 432 violence, the court shall set a final full hearing on the 433 petition for injunction with notice at the earliest possible 434 time. Nothing herein affects a petitionerâs right to promptly 435 amend any petition, or otherwise be heard in person on any 436 petition consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. 437 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction shall be 438 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. A final full 439 hearing, as provided by this section, shall be set for a date no 440 later than the date when the temporary injunction ceases to be 441 effective. The court may grant a continuance of the hearing 442 before or during a hearing for good cause shown by any party, 443 which shall include a continuance to obtain service of process. 444 Any injunction shall be extended if necessary to remain in full 445 force and effect during any period of continuance. 446 (6)(a)âUpon notice and final hearing, when it appears to 447 the court that the petitioner is either the victim of domestic 448 violence as defined by s. 741.28 or has reasonable cause to 449 believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of 450 domestic violence, the court may grant such relief as the court 451 deems proper, including an injunction: 452 1.âRestraining the respondent from committing any acts of 453 domestic violence. 454 2.âAwarding to the petitioner the exclusive use and 455 possession of the dwelling that the parties share or excluding 456 the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 457 3.âOn the same basis as provided in chapter 61, providing 458 the petitioner with 100 percent of the time-sharing in a 459 temporary parenting plan that remains in effect until the order 460 expires or an order is entered by a court of competent 461 jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action or 462 proceeding affecting the placement of, access to, parental time 463 with, adoption of, or parental rights and responsibilities for 464 the minor child. 465 4.âIf the petitioner and respondent have an existing 466 parenting plan or time-sharing schedule under another court 467 order, designating that the exchange of the minor child or 468 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 469 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 470 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if the 471 court determines it is in the best interests of the child after 472 consideration of all of the factors specified in s. 61.13(3). 473 5.âOn the same basis as provided in chapter 61, 474 establishing temporary support for a minor child or children or 475 the petitioner. An order of temporary support remains in effect 476 until the order expires or an order is entered by a court of 477 competent jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action 478 or proceeding affecting child support. 479 6.âOrdering the respondent to participate in treatment, 480 intervention, or counseling services to be paid for by the 481 respondent. When the court orders the respondent to participate 482 in a batterersâ intervention program, the court, or any entity 483 designated by the court, must provide the respondent with a list 484 of batterersâ intervention programs from which the respondent 485 must choose a program in which to participate. 486 7.âReferring a petitioner to a certified domestic violence 487 center. The court must provide the petitioner with a list of 488 certified domestic violence centers in the circuit which the 489 petitioner may contact. 490 8.âAwarding to the petitioner the exclusive care, 491 possession, or control of an animal that is owned, possessed, 492 harbored, kept, or held by the petitioner, the respondent, or a 493 minor child residing in the residence or household of the 494 petitioner or respondent. The court may order the respondent to 495 have no contact with the animal and prohibit the respondent from 496 taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 497 otherwise disposing of the animal. This subparagraph does not 498 apply to an animal owned primarily for a bona fide agricultural 499 purpose, as defined under s. 193.461, or to a service animal, as 500 defined under s. 413.08, if the respondent is the service 501 animalâs handler. 502 9.âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 503 for the protection of a victim of domestic violence, including 504 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as 505 provided in this section. 506 (b)âIn determining whether a petitioner has reasonable 507 cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a 508 victim of domestic violence, the court shall consider and 509 evaluate all relevant factors alleged in the petition, 510 including, but not limited to: 511 1.âThe history between the petitioner and the respondent, 512 including threats, harassment, stalking, strangulation, or other 513 and physical abuse. 514 2.âWhether the respondent has attempted to harm the 515 petitioner or family members or individuals closely associated 516 with the petitioner. 517 3.âWhether the respondent has threatened to conceal, 518 kidnap, or harm the petitionerâs child or children. 519 4.âWhether the respondent has intentionally injured or 520 killed a family pet. 521 5.âWhether the respondent has used, or has threatened to 522 use, against the petitioner any weapons such as guns or knives. 523 6.âWhether the respondent has physically restrained the 524 petitioner from leaving the home or calling law enforcement. 525 7.âWhether the respondent has a criminal history involving 526 violence or the threat of violence. 527 8.âThe existence of a verifiable order of protection issued 528 previously or from another jurisdiction. 529 9.âWhether the respondent has destroyed personal property, 530 including, but not limited to, telephones or other 531 communications equipment, clothing, or other items belonging to 532 the petitioner. 533 10.âWhether the respondent has or had engaged in a pattern 534 of abusive, threatening, intimidating, or controlling behavior 535 composed of a series of acts over a period of time, however 536 short, which evidences a continuity of purpose and which 537 reasonably causes the petitioner to believe that the petitioner 538 or his or her minor child or children are in imminent danger of 539 becoming victims of any act of domestic violence. 540 11.âWhether the respondent engaged in any other behavior or 541 conduct that leads the petitioner to have reasonable cause to 542 believe that he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a 543 victim of domestic violence. 544 545 In making its determination under this paragraph, the court is 546 not limited to those factors enumerated in subparagraphs 1.-11. 547 (c)âThe terms of an injunction restraining the respondent 548 under subparagraph (a)1. or ordering other relief for the 549 protection of the victim under subparagraph (a)9. shall remain 550 in effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 551 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. No specific 552 allegations are required. Such relief may be granted in addition 553 to other civil or criminal remedies. 554 (d)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 555 protection against domestic violence entered under this section 556 shall, on its face, indicate that: 557 1.âThe injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties 558 of the State of Florida. 559 2.âLaw enforcement officers may use their arrest powers 560 under s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 561 3.âThe court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter 562 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and 563 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 564 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 565 process. 566 4.âThe date the respondent was served with the temporary or 567 final order, if obtainable. 568 (e)âAn injunction for protection against domestic violence 569 entered under this section, on its face, may order that the 570 respondent attend a batterersâ intervention program as a 571 condition of the injunction. Unless the court makes written 572 factual findings in its judgment or order which are based on 573 substantial evidence, stating why batterersâ intervention 574 programs would be inappropriate, the court shall order the 575 respondent to attend a batterersâ intervention program if: 576 1.âIt finds that the respondent willfully violated the 577 temporary ex parte injunction; 578 2.âThe respondent, in this state or any other state, has 579 been convicted of, had adjudication withheld on, or pled nolo 580 contendere to a crime involving violence or a threat of 581 violence; or 582 3.âThe respondent, in this state or any other state, has 583 had at any time a prior injunction for protection entered 584 against the respondent after a hearing with notice. 585 (f)âThe fact that a separate order of protection is granted 586 to each opposing party is not legally sufficient to deny any 587 remedy to either party or to prove that the parties are equally 588 at fault or equally endangered. 589 (g)âA final judgment on injunction for protection against 590 domestic violence entered under this section must, on its face, 591 indicate that it is a violation of s. 790.233, and a first 592 degree misdemeanor, for the respondent to have in his or her 593 care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or ammunition. 594 (h)âAll proceedings under this subsection shall be 595 recorded. Recording may be by electronic means as provided by 596 the Rules of General Practice and Judicial Administration. 597 (7)âThe court shall allow an advocate from a state 598 attorneyâs office, an advocate from a law enforcement agency, or 599 an advocate from a certified domestic violence center who is 600 registered under s. 39.905 to be present with the petitioner or 601 respondent during any court proceedings or hearings related to 602 the injunction for protection, provided the petitioner or 603 respondent has made such a request and the advocate is able to 604 be present. 605 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court sets the case for 606 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against 607 domestic violence, the clerk of the court shall electronically 608 transmit a copy of the petition, designation of mailing and e 609 mail addresses for service, financial affidavit, Uniform Child 610 Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act affidavit, if any, 611 notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, to the 612 sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where the 613 respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon the 614 respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the week 615 and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall file a 616 designation of mailing and e-mail addresses with the clerk of 617 the court for subsequent service within 1 business day after the 618 respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of the 619 temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of the 620 court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same manner 621 as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of the 622 temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with the 623 sender before attempting to serve it upon the respondent. In 624 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of a temporary an 625 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk 626 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of 627 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall 628 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of 629 the court is responsible for furnishing to the sheriff such 630 information on the respondentâs physical description and 631 location as is required by the department to comply with the 632 verification procedures set forth in this section. 633 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the chief judge 634 of each circuit, in consultation with the appropriate sheriff, 635 may authorize a law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction 636 to effect service. A law enforcement agency serving injunctions 637 pursuant to this section must use service and verification 638 procedures consistent with those of the sheriff. 639 2.âWhen an injunction is issued, if the petitioner requests 640 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 641 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 642 accompany the petitioner and assist in placing the petitioner in 643 possession of the dwelling or residence, or otherwise assist in 644 the execution or service of the temporary or final injunction. A 645 law enforcement officer must accept a copy of the temporary or 646 final an injunction for protection against domestic violence, 647 certified by the clerk of the court, from the petitioner and 648 immediately serve it upon a respondent who has been located but 649 not yet served. 650 3.âAll orders issued, changed, continued, extended, or 651 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents 652 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk 653 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the 654 entry of the subsequent order, if a party is physically present 655 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such 656 order in writing on the face of the original order. If In the 657 event a party fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a 658 certified copy of an order, the clerk shall note on the original 659 order that service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is 660 not possible or the parties have appeared through audio-video 661 communication technology, the clerk must shall mail or e-mail 662 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known 663 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 664 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 665 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection, 666 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in 667 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service 668 and shall notify the sheriff. 669 670 If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement officer 671 previously with the temporary injunction or a notice of hearing 672 on a and has failed to appear at the initial hearing on the 673 temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for injunction 674 seeking an extension of time, any subsequent temporary or final 675 injunction, or any subsequent order may be served on the 676 respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or e-mail 677 in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer. 678 (b)âA Domestic and Repeat Violence Injunction Statewide 679 Injunction Verification System is created within the Department 680 of Law Enforcement. The department shall establish, implement, 681 and maintain a statewide communication system capable of 682 electronically transmitting information to and between criminal 683 justice agencies relating to domestic violence injunctions, 684 dating violence injunctions, sexual violence injunctions, and 685 repeat violence injunctions, and stalking injunctions issued by 686 the courts throughout the state. Such information must include, 687 but is not limited to, information as to the existence and 688 status of any injunction for verification purposes. 689 (c)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues a temporary an 690 injunction for protection against domestic violence or changes, 691 continues, extends, or vacates an injunction for protection 692 against domestic violence, the clerk of the court must 693 electronically transmit a certified copy of the injunction for 694 service to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence of 695 the petitioner. The injunction must be served in accordance with 696 this subsection. 697 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 698 injunction for protection against domestic violence upon a 699 respondent, the law enforcement officer must electronically 700 transmit the written proof of service of process to the sheriff 701 with jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner. 702 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 703 copy of the injunction for protection against domestic violence, 704 the sheriff must make information relating to the injunction 705 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically 706 transmitting such information to the department. 707 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 708 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 709 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 710 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 711 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 712 department. 713 5.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues a final 714 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues, 715 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against 716 domestic violence, the clerk must mail or e-mail certified 717 copies of the injunction order to the last known physical or e 718 mail address of each party. Service by mail or e-mail is 719 complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is served 720 pursuant to this subsection by the clerk of the court, the clerk 721 shall prepare a written certification to be placed in the court 722 file specifying the time, date, and method of service. The clerk 723 of the court must electronically transmit a certified copy of 724 the injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the 725 residence of the petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff 726 receives a certified copy of the injunction for protection 727 against domestic violence under this subsection, the sheriff 728 must make information relating to the injunction available to 729 other law enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting 730 such information to the department. 731 6.âSubject to available funding, the Florida Association of 732 Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated process 733 by which a petitioner may request notification of service of the 734 injunction for protection against domestic violence and other 735 court actions related to the injunction for protection. The 736 automated notice must be made within 12 hours after the sheriff 737 or other law enforcement officer serves the injunction upon the 738 respondent. The notification must include, at a minimum, the 739 date, time, and location where the injunction for protection 740 against domestic violence was served. The Florida Association of 741 Court Clerks and Comptrollers may apply for any available grants 742 to fund the development of the automated process. 743 7.6.âWithin 24 hours after an injunction for protection 744 against domestic violence is vacated, terminated, or otherwise 745 rendered no longer effective by ruling of the court, the clerk 746 of the court must notify the sheriff receiving original 747 notification of the injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. 748 That agency shall, within 24 hours after receiving such 749 notification from the clerk of the court, notify the department 750 of such action of the court. 751 (d)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 752 after the court has issued a final injunction order of 753 protection. 754 (9)(a)âThe court may enforce a violation of an injunction 755 for protection against domestic violence through a civil or 756 criminal contempt proceeding, or the state attorney may 757 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 741.31. The court 758 may enforce the respondentâs compliance with the injunction 759 through any appropriate civil and criminal remedies, including, 760 but not limited to, a monetary assessment or a fine. The clerk 761 of the court shall collect and receive such assessments or 762 fines. On a monthly basis, the clerk shall transfer the moneys 763 collected pursuant to this paragraph to the State Treasury for 764 deposit in the Domestic Violence Trust Fund established in s. 765 741.01. 766 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 767 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 741.31, the 768 respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the 769 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing 770 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with 771 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, 772 pending a hearing. 773 (10)âThe petitioner or the respondent may move the court to 774 modify or dissolve an injunction at any time. 775 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraph (b) 776 of subsection (4), and subsections (5) through (9) of section 777 784.046, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (f) is 778 added to subsection (2) of that section, to read: 779 784.046âAction by victim of repeat violence, sexual 780 violence, or dating violence for protective injunction; dating 781 violence investigations, notice to victims, and reporting; 782 pretrial release violations; public records exemption.â 783 (2)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 784 for protection in cases of repeat violence, there is created a 785 separate cause of action for an injunction for protection in 786 cases of dating violence, and there is created a separate cause 787 of action for an injunction for protection in cases of sexual 788 violence. 789 (f)âThe court is prohibited from issuing mutual orders of 790 protection. This does not preclude the court from issuing 791 separate injunctions for protection against repeat violence, 792 sexual violence, or dating violence if each party has complied 793 with this section. Compliance with this section may not be 794 waived. 795 (3)(a)âThe clerk of the court shall provide a copy of this 796 section, simplified forms for the injunction, a designation of 797 mailing and e-mail addresses for service, and clerical 798 assistance for the preparation and filing of such a petition by 799 any person who is not represented by counsel. 800 (4) 801 (b)âThe verified petition must be in substantially the 802 following form: 803 804 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 805 AGAINST REPEAT VIOLENCE, SEXUAL 806 VIOLENCE, OR DATING VIOLENCE 807 808 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 809 penalties of perjury that the following statements are true: 810 811 1.âPetitioner resides at ...(address)... (A petitioner for 812 an injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual 813 violence, or dating violence may furnish an address to the court 814 in a separate confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the 815 petitioner requires the location of his or her current residence 816 to be confidential pursuant to s. 119.071(2)(j), Florida 817 Statutes.) 818 2.âRespondent resides at ...(address).... 819 3.a.âPetitioner has suffered repeat violence as 820 demonstrated by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate 821 incidents of violence)... 822 823 824 825 826 827 b.âPetitioner has suffered sexual violence as demonstrated 828 by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate incident of 829 violence and include incident report number from law enforcement 830 agency or attach notice of inmate release)... 831 832 833 834 835 836 c.âPetitioner is a victim of dating violence and has 837 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 838 of becoming the victim of another act of dating violence or has 839 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 840 of becoming a victim of dating violence, as demonstrated by the 841 fact that the respondent has: ...(list the specific incident or 842 incidents of violence and describe the length of time of the 843 relationship, whether it has been in existence during the last 6 844 months, the nature of the relationship of a romantic or intimate 845 nature, the frequency and type of interaction, and any other 846 facts that characterize the relationship)... 847 848 849 850 851 852 4.âPetitioner genuinely fears repeat violence by the 853 respondent. 854 5.âPetitioner seeks: an immediate injunction against the 855 respondent, enjoining him or her from committing any further 856 acts of violence; an injunction enjoining the respondent from 857 committing any further acts of violence; and an injunction 858 providing any terms the court deems necessary for the protection 859 of the petitioner and the petitionerâs immediate family, 860 including any injunctions or directives to law enforcement 861 agencies. 862 863 (5)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall review 864 the petition ex parte. The court must set a final hearing to be 865 held at the earliest possible time if it appears that the 866 petitioner meets the criteria of paragraph (2)(a), paragraph 867 (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c). If a final hearing is set, the 868 respondent must shall be personally served by a law enforcement 869 officer with a copy of the petition, designation of mailing and 870 e-mail addresses, notice of final hearing, and temporary 871 injunction, if any, before prior to the final hearing. 872 (6)(a)âUpon review of the petition, if When it appears to 873 the court that an immediate and present danger of violence 874 exists, the court may grant a temporary injunction ex parte 875 which may be granted in an ex parte hearing, pending a final 876 full hearing, and may grant such relief as the court deems 877 proper, including an injunction enjoining the respondent from 878 committing any acts of violence. 879 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in an a hearing ex 880 parte review or hearing for the purpose of obtaining such 881 temporary injunction, no evidence other than the verified 882 pleadings or affidavits may not pleading or affidavit shall be 883 used as evidence, unless the respondent appears at the hearing 884 or has received reasonable notice of the hearing. A courtâs 885 denial of a petition for an ex parte temporary injunction must 886 be by written order noting the legal grounds for the denial. 887 When the only grounds for denial is no appearance of an 888 immediate and present danger of violence, the court may set a 889 final hearing on the petition without issuing a temporary 890 injunction with notice at the earliest possible time. This 891 paragraph does not affect a petitionerâs right to promptly 892 dismiss a petition, amend a petition, or otherwise be heard in 893 person on a petition consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil 894 Procedure. 895 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction shall be 896 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. However, an 897 ex parte temporary injunction granted under subparagraph 898 (2)(c)2. is effective for 15 days following the date the 899 respondent is released from incarceration. If a final A full 900 hearing is set, it must as provided by this section, shall be 901 set for a date no later than the date when the temporary 902 injunction ceases to be effective. The court may grant a 903 continuance of the temporary ex parte injunction before or 904 during the final and the full hearing before or during a 905 hearing, for good cause shown by any party, which includes a 906 continuance to obtain service of process. Any injunction must be 907 extended if necessary to remain in full force and effect during 908 any period of continuance. 909 (7)âUpon notice and final hearing, the court may grant such 910 relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction: 911 (a)âEnjoining the respondent from committing any acts of 912 violence. 913 (b)âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 914 for the protection of the petitioner, including injunctions or 915 directives to law enforcement agencies, as provided in this 916 section. 917 (c)âThe terms of the injunction shall remain in full force 918 and effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 919 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Such relief may 920 be granted in addition to other civil or criminal remedies. 921 (d)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 922 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 923 violence entered pursuant to this section shall, on its face, 924 indicate that: 925 1.âThe injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties 926 of the State of Florida. 927 2.âLaw enforcement officers may use their arrest powers 928 pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 929 3.âThe court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter 930 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and 931 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 932 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 933 process. 934 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 935 temporary or final order, if obtainable. 936 5.âAll proceedings under this paragraph must be recorded. 937 Recording may be by electronic means as provided by the Rules of 938 General Practice and Judicial Administration. 939 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court sets the case for 940 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against 941 repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, the clerk 942 of the court shall electronically transmit a copy of the 943 petition, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, 944 to the sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where 945 the respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon 946 the respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the 947 week and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall 948 file a designation of mailing or e-mail addresses with the clerk 949 of the court for subsequent service within 1 business day after 950 the respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of 951 the temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of 952 the court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same 953 manner as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of 954 the temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with 955 the sender before attempting to serve it upon the respondent. In 956 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of the temporary an 957 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk 958 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of 959 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall 960 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of 961 the court is responsible for furnishing to the sheriff such 962 information on the respondentâs physical description and 963 location as is required by the department to comply with the 964 verification procedures set forth in this section. 965 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the chief judge 966 of each circuit, in consultation with the appropriate sheriff, 967 may authorize a law enforcement agency within the chief judgeâs 968 jurisdiction to effect this type of service and to receive a 969 portion of the service fee. A person may not serve or execute a 970 temporary an injunction issued under this section unless the 971 person is a law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 943. 972 2.âWhen an injunction is issued, if the petitioner requests 973 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 974 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 975 accompany the petitioner and assist in the execution or service 976 of the temporary or final injunction. A law enforcement officer 977 must accept a copy of the temporary or final an injunction for 978 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 979 violence, certified by the clerk of the court, from the 980 petitioner and immediately serve it upon a respondent who has 981 been located but not yet served. 982 3.âAll orders issued, changed, continued, extended, or 983 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents 984 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk 985 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the 986 entry of the subsequent order if a party is physically present 987 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such 988 order in writing on the face of the original order. If a party 989 fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a certified copy 990 of an order, the clerk must note on the original order that 991 service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is not 992 possible, or the parties have appeared through audio-video 993 communication technology, the clerk must mail or e-mail 994 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known 995 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 996 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 997 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection, 998 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in 999 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service 1000 and shall notify the sheriff. 1001 1002 If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement officer 1003 with the temporary injunction or a notice of hearing on a 1004 temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for injunction 1005 seeking an extension of time, or any subsequent temporary 1006 injunction, final injunction, or order, may be served on the 1007 respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or e 1008 mail, in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer. 1009 (b)âA Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat Violence 1010 Injunction Statewide Injunction Verification System is created 1011 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall 1012 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication 1013 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1014 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1015 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence 1016 injunctions, and repeat violence injunctions, and stalking 1017 injunctions issued by the courts throughout the state. Such 1018 information must include, but is not limited to, information as 1019 to the existence and status of any injunction for verification 1020 purposes. 1021 (c)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues an injunction 1022 for protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or 1023 dating violence or changes or vacates an injunction for 1024 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 1025 violence, the clerk of the court must electronically transmit a 1026 copy of the injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the 1027 residence of the petitioner. 1028 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 1029 injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual 1030 violence, or dating violence upon a respondent, the law 1031 enforcement officer must electronically transmit the written 1032 proof of service of process to the sheriff with jurisdiction 1033 over the residence of the petitioner. 1034 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 1035 copy of the injunction for protection against repeat violence, 1036 sexual violence, or dating violence, the sheriff must make 1037 information relating to the injunction available to other law 1038 enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such 1039 information to the department. 1040 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 1041 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 1042 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 1043 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 1044 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 1045 department. 1046 5.â Within 24 hours after the court issues a final 1047 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues, 1048 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against repeat, 1049 sexual, or dating violence, the clerk must mail or e-mail 1050 certified copies of the injunction order to the last known 1051 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 1052 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 1053 served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall prepare a 1054 written certification to be placed in the court file specifying 1055 the time, date, and method of service. The clerk of the court 1056 shall electronically transmit a certified copy of the injunction 1057 to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence of the 1058 petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a 1059 certified copy of the injunction for protection against domestic 1060 violence under this subsection, the sheriff must make 1061 information relating to the injunction available to other law 1062 enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such 1063 information to the department. 1064 6.âSubject to available funding, the Florida Association of 1065 Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated process 1066 by which a petitioner may request notification of service of the 1067 injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual 1068 violence, or dating violence and other court actions related to 1069 the injunction for protection. The automated notice must be made 1070 within 12 hours after the sheriff or other law enforcement 1071 officer serves the injunction upon the respondent. The 1072 notification must include, at a minimum, the date, time, and 1073 location where the injunction for protection against repeat 1074 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence was served. The 1075 Florida Association of Court Clerks and Comptrollers may apply 1076 for any available grants to fund the development of the 1077 automated process. 1078 7.6.âWithin 24 hours after an injunction for protection 1079 against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence is 1080 lifted, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer effective by 1081 ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must notify the 1082 sheriff or local law enforcement agency receiving original 1083 notification of the injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. 1084 That agency shall, within 24 hours after receiving such 1085 notification from the clerk of the court, notify the department 1086 of such action of the court. 1087 (d)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 1088 after the court has issued a final injunction order of 1089 protection. 1090 (9)(a)âThe court shall enforce, through a civil or criminal 1091 contempt proceeding, a violation of the temporary or final an 1092 injunction for protection. The court may enforce the 1093 respondentâs compliance with the injunction by imposing a 1094 monetary assessment. The clerk of the court shall collect and 1095 receive such assessments. On a monthly basis, the clerk shall 1096 transfer the moneys collected pursuant to this paragraph to the 1097 State Treasury for deposit in the Crimes Compensation Trust Fund 1098 established in s. 960.21. 1099 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 1100 officer under s. 901.15(6) for committing an act of repeat 1101 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence in violation of a 1102 temporary or final an injunction for protection, the respondent 1103 shall be held in custody until brought before the court as 1104 expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing the 1105 injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with chapter 1106 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, pending a 1107 hearing. 1108 Section 3.âSection 784.0485, Florida Statutes, is amended 1109 to read: 1110 784.0485âStalking; injunction; powers and duties of court 1111 and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary injunction; 1112 issuance of injunction; Statewide Injunction Verification 1113 System; enforcement.â 1114 (1)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 1115 for protection against stalking. For the purposes of injunctions 1116 for protection against stalking under this section, the offense 1117 of stalking shall include the offense of cyberstalking. 1118 (a)âA person who is the victim of stalking or the parent or 1119 legal guardian of a minor child who is living at home who seeks 1120 an injunction for protection against stalking on behalf of the 1121 minor child has standing in the circuit court to file a verified 1122 petition for an injunction for protection against stalking. 1123 (b)âThe cause of action for an injunction for protection 1124 may be sought regardless of whether any other cause of action is 1125 currently pending between the parties. However, the pendency of 1126 any such cause of action shall be alleged in the petition. 1127 (c)âThe cause of action for an injunction may be sought by 1128 any affected person. 1129 (d)âThe cause of action for an injunction does not require 1130 either party to be represented by an attorney. 1131 (e)âThe court may not issue mutual orders of protection; 1132 however, the court is not precluded from issuing separate 1133 injunctions for protection against stalking if each party has 1134 complied with this section. Compliance with this section may not 1135 be waived. 1136 (f)âNotwithstanding chapter 47, a petition for an 1137 injunction for protection against stalking may be filed in the 1138 circuit where the petitioner currently or temporarily resides, 1139 where the respondent resides, or where the stalking occurred. 1140 There is no minimum requirement of residency to petition for an 1141 injunction for protection. 1142 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the clerk of court 1143 may not assess a filing fee to file a petition for protection 1144 against stalking. However, subject to legislative appropriation, 1145 the clerk of the circuit court may, on a quarterly basis, submit 1146 to the Justice Administrative Commission a certified request for 1147 reimbursement for petitions for protection against stalking 1148 issued by the court, at the rate of $40 per petition. The 1149 request for reimbursement must be submitted in the form and 1150 manner prescribed by the Justice Administrative Commission. From 1151 this reimbursement, the clerk shall pay any law enforcement 1152 agency serving the injunction the fee requested by the law 1153 enforcement agency; however, this fee may not exceed $20. 1154 (b)âA bond is not required by the court for the entry of an 1155 injunction. 1156 (c)1.âThe clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in 1157 seeking both injunctions for protection against stalking and 1158 enforcement of a violation thereof as specified in this section. 1159 2.âAll offices of the clerk of the court shall provide 1160 simplified petition forms for the injunction and any 1161 modifications to and the enforcement thereof, and a designation 1162 of mailing and e-mail addresses for service, including 1163 instructions for completion. 1164 3.âThe clerk of the court shall ensure the petitionerâs 1165 privacy to the extent practicable while completing the forms for 1166 an injunction for protection against stalking. 1167 4.âThe clerk of the court shall provide a petitioner with a 1168 minimum of two certified copies of the order of injunction, one 1169 of which is serviceable and will inform the petitioner of the 1170 process for service and enforcement. 1171 5.âThe clerk of the court and appropriate staff in each 1172 county shall receive training in the effective assistance of 1173 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association 1174 of Court Clerks and Comptrollers. 1175 6.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall make 1176 available informational brochures on stalking when such a 1177 brochure is provided by the local certified domestic violence 1178 center or certified rape crisis center. 1179 7.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall distribute a 1180 statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the 1181 time of filing for an injunction for protection against stalking 1182 when such brochures become available. The brochure must include 1183 information about the effect of giving the court false 1184 information. 1185 (3)(a)âThe verified petition shall allege the existence of 1186 such stalking and shall include the specific facts and 1187 circumstances for which relief is sought. 1188 (b)âThe verified petition shall be in substantially the 1189 following form: 1190 1191 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION 1192 FOR PROTECTION AGAINST STALKING 1193 1194 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 1195 penalties of perjury that the following statements are 1196 true: 1197 1198 1.âPetitioner resides at: ...(address)... 1199 (Petitioner may furnish the address to the court in a 1200 separate confidential filing if, for safety reasons, 1201 the petitioner requires the location of the current 1202 residence to be confidential.) 1203 2.âRespondent resides at: ...(last known address)... 1204 3.âRespondentâs last known place of employment: 1205 ...(name of business and address)... 1206 4.âPhysical description of respondent: .... 1207 5.âRace: .... 1208 6.âSex: .... 1209 7.âDate of birth: .... 1210 8.âHeight: .... 1211 9.âWeight: .... 1212 10.âEye color: .... 1213 11.âHair color: .... 1214 12.âDistinguishing marks or scars: .... 1215 13.âAliases of respondent: .... 1216 1217 (c)âThe petitioner shall describe any other cause of action 1218 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent. The 1219 petitioner shall also describe any previous attempt by the 1220 petitioner to obtain an injunction for protection against 1221 stalking in this or any other circuit, and the result of that 1222 attempt. (Case numbers should be included, if available.) 1223 (d)âThe petition must provide space for the petitioner to 1224 specifically allege that he or she is a victim of stalking 1225 because respondent has: 1226 1227 (Mark all sections that apply and describe in the 1228 spaces below the incidents of stalking specifying when 1229 and where they occurred, including, but not limited 1230 to, locations such as a home, school, or place of 1231 employment.) 1232 1233 .... Committed stalking. 1234 .... Previously threatened, harassed, stalked, 1235 cyberstalked, or physically abused the petitioner. 1236 .... Threatened to harm the petitioner or family members or 1237 individuals closely associated with the petitioner. 1238 .... Intentionally injured or killed a family pet. 1239 .... Used, or threatened to use, against the petitioner any 1240 weapons such as guns or knives. 1241 .... A criminal history involving violence or the threat of 1242 violence, if known. 1243 .... Another order of protection issued against him or her 1244 previously or from another jurisdiction, if known. 1245 .... Destroyed personal property, including, but not 1246 limited to, telephones or other communication equipment, 1247 clothing, or other items belonging to the petitioner. 1248 1249 (e)âThe petitioner seeks an injunction: 1250 1251 (Mark appropriate section or sections.) 1252 1253 .... Immediately restraining the respondent from committing 1254 any acts of stalking. 1255 .... Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of 1256 stalking. 1257 .... Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the 1258 protection of a victim of stalking, including any injunctions or 1259 directives to law enforcement agencies. 1260 1261 (f)âEvery petition for an injunction against stalking must 1262 contain, directly above the signature line, a statement in all 1263 capital letters and bold type not smaller than the surrounding 1264 text, as follows: 1265 1266 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ 1267 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT 1268 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN 1269 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF 1270 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, 1271 FLORIDA STATUTES. 1272 1273 ...(initials)... 1274 1275 (4)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall review 1276 the petition ex parte. The court must set a final hearing to be 1277 held at the earliest possible time if it appears that the 1278 petitioner is a victim of stalking. If a final hearing is set, 1279 the respondent must shall be personally served by a law 1280 enforcement officer with a copy of the petition, notice of 1281 hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, before the final 1282 hearing. 1283 (5)(a)âUpon review of the petition, if it appears to the 1284 court that stalking exists, the court may grant a temporary 1285 injunction ex parte, pending a final full hearing, and may grant 1286 such relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction 1287 restraining the respondent from committing any act of stalking. 1288 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in an ex parte review 1289 or an a hearing ex parte hearing for the purpose of obtaining 1290 such ex parte temporary injunction, evidence other than verified 1291 pleadings or affidavits may not be used as evidence, unless the 1292 respondent appears at the hearing or has received reasonable 1293 notice of the hearing. A denial of a petition for an ex parte 1294 temporary injunction shall be by written order noting the legal 1295 grounds for denial. If the only ground for denial is no 1296 appearance of an immediate and present danger of stalking, the 1297 court shall set a final full hearing on the petition for 1298 injunction with notice at the earliest possible time. This 1299 paragraph does not affect a petitionerâs right to promptly amend 1300 any petition, or otherwise be heard in person on any petition 1301 consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. 1302 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction is effective for 1303 a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. If a final full hearing is 1304 set, as provided in this section, the hearing shall be set for a 1305 date no later than the date when the temporary injunction ceases 1306 to be effective. The court may grant a continuance of the 1307 hearing before or during the final a hearing for good cause 1308 shown by any party, which shall include a continuance to obtain 1309 service of process. An injunction shall be extended if necessary 1310 to remain in full force and effect during any period of 1311 continuance. 1312 (6)(a)âUpon notice and final hearing, when it appears to 1313 the court that the petitioner is the victim of stalking, the 1314 court may grant such relief as the court deems proper, including 1315 an injunction: 1316 1.âRestraining the respondent from committing any act of 1317 stalking. 1318 2.âOrdering the respondent to participate in treatment, 1319 intervention, or counseling services to be paid for by the 1320 respondent. 1321 3.âReferring a petitioner to appropriate services. The 1322 court may provide the petitioner with a list of certified 1323 domestic violence centers, certified rape crisis centers, and 1324 other appropriate referrals in the circuit which the petitioner 1325 may contact. 1326 4.âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 1327 for the protection of a victim of stalking, including 1328 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as 1329 provided in this section. 1330 (b)âThe terms of an injunction restraining the respondent 1331 under subparagraph (a)1. or ordering other relief for the 1332 protection of the victim under subparagraph (a)4. shall remain 1333 in effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 1334 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Specific 1335 allegations are not required. Such relief may be granted in 1336 addition to other civil or criminal remedies. 1337 (c)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 1338 protection against stalking entered pursuant to this section 1339 shall, on its face, indicate: 1340 1.âThat the injunction is valid and enforceable in all 1341 counties of this state. 1342 2.âThat law enforcement officers may use their arrest 1343 powers pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the 1344 injunction. 1345 3.âThat the court has jurisdiction over the parties and 1346 matter under the laws of this state and that reasonable notice 1347 and opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom 1348 the order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to 1349 due process. 1350 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 1351 temporary or final injunction order, if obtainable. 1352 (d)âThe fact that a separate injunction order of protection 1353 is granted to each opposing party is not legally sufficient to 1354 deny any remedy to either party or to prove that the parties are 1355 equally at fault or equally endangered. 1356 (e)âA final judgment on an injunction for protection 1357 against stalking entered pursuant to this section must, on its 1358 face, provide that it is a violation of s. 790.233 and a 1359 misdemeanor of the first degree for the respondent to have in 1360 his or her care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or 1361 ammunition. 1362 (f)âAll proceedings under this subsection shall be 1363 recorded. Recording may be by electronic means as provided by 1364 the Rules of General Practice and Judicial Administration. 1365 (7)âThe court shall allow an advocate from a state 1366 attorneyâs office, a law enforcement agency, a certified rape 1367 crisis center, or a certified domestic violence center who is 1368 registered under s. 39.905 to be present with the petitioner or 1369 respondent during any court proceedings or hearings related to 1370 the injunction for protection if the petitioner or respondent 1371 has made such a request and the advocate is able to be present. 1372 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court sets the case for 1373 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against 1374 stalking, the clerk of the court shall electronically transmit a 1375 copy of the petition, designation of mailing and e-mail 1376 addresses, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, 1377 to the sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where 1378 the respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon 1379 the respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the 1380 week and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall 1381 file a designation of mailing or e-mail addresses with the clerk 1382 of the court for subsequent service within 1 business day after 1383 the respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of 1384 the temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of 1385 the court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same 1386 manner as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of 1387 the temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with 1388 the sender before attempting to serve it on the respondent. In 1389 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of a temporary an 1390 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk 1391 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of 1392 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall 1393 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of 1394 the court shall furnish to the sheriff such information 1395 concerning the respondentâs physical description and location as 1396 is required by the Department of Law Enforcement to comply with 1397 the verification procedures set forth in this section. 1398 Notwithstanding any other law, the chief judge of each circuit, 1399 in consultation with the appropriate sheriff, may authorize a 1400 law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction to effect 1401 service. A law enforcement agency serving injunctions pursuant 1402 to this section must use service and verification procedures 1403 consistent with those of the sheriff. 1404 2.âIf an injunction is issued and the petitioner requests 1405 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 1406 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 1407 accompany the petitioner to assist in the execution or service 1408 of the temporary or final injunction. A law enforcement officer 1409 must accept a copy of a temporary or final an injunction for 1410 protection against stalking, certified by the clerk of the 1411 court, from the petitioner and immediately serve it upon a 1412 respondent who has been located but not yet served. 1413 3.âAn order issued, changed, continued, extended, or 1414 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents 1415 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk 1416 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the 1417 entry of the subsequent order if a party is physically present 1418 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such 1419 order in writing on the face of the original order. In the event 1420 If a party fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a 1421 certified copy of an order, the clerk must shall note on the 1422 original order that service was effected. If delivery at the 1423 hearing is not possible, or the parties have appeared through 1424 audio-video communication technology, the clerk must shall mail 1425 or e-mail certified copies of the order to the parties at the 1426 last known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by 1427 mail or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an 1428 order is served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this 1429 subsection, the clerk shall prepare a written certification to 1430 be placed in the court file specifying the time, date, and 1431 method of service and shall notify the sheriff. 1432 4.âIf the respondent has been served by a law enforcement 1433 officer previously with the a temporary injunction or a notice 1434 of hearing on a and has failed to appear at the initial hearing 1435 on the temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for 1436 injunction seeking an extension of time and any subsequent 1437 temporary injunction, final injunction, or order may be served 1438 on the respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or 1439 e-mail in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer. 1440 5.âA Statewide Injunction Verification System is created 1441 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall 1442 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication 1443 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1444 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1445 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence 1446 injunctions, repeat violence injunctions, and stalking 1447 injunctions issued by the courts throughout this state. Such 1448 information must include, but is not limited to, information as 1449 to the existence and status of any injunction for verification 1450 purposes. 1451 (b)1.âSubsequent to the original service of documents in 1452 subparagraph (a)1., the clerk of the court, within 24 hours 1453 after the court issues a final an injunction for protection 1454 against stalking or changes, continues, extends, or vacates a 1455 temporary an injunction for protection against stalking, the 1456 clerk of the court must electronically transmit a certified copy 1457 of the injunction for service to the sheriff having jurisdiction 1458 over the residence of the petitioner. The clerk must mail or e 1459 mail certified copies of the order to the parties to the last 1460 known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail 1461 or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order 1462 is served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall prepare a 1463 written certification to be placed in the court file specifying 1464 the time, date, and method of service and shall electronically 1465 transmit a certified copy of the order to the sheriff with 1466 jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner The injunction 1467 must be served in accordance with this subsection. 1468 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 1469 injunction for protection against stalking upon a respondent, 1470 the law enforcement officer must electronically transmit the 1471 written proof of service of process to the sheriff having 1472 jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner. 1473 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 1474 copy of the injunction for protection against stalking, the 1475 sheriff must make information relating to the injunction 1476 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically 1477 transmitting such information to the Department of Law 1478 Enforcement. 1479 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 1480 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 1481 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 1482 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 1483 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 1484 Department of Law Enforcement. 1485 5.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues a final 1486 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues, 1487 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against 1488 stalking is vacated, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer 1489 effective by ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must 1490 mail or e-mail certified copies of the injunction order to the 1491 last known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by 1492 mail or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an 1493 order is served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall 1494 prepare a written certification to be placed in the court file 1495 specifying the time, date, and method or service. The clerk of 1496 the court must electronically transmit a certified copy of the 1497 injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence 1498 of the petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a 1499 certified copy of the injunction for protection against stalking 1500 under this subsection, the sheriff must make information 1501 relating to the injunction available to other law enforcement 1502 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to 1503 notify the sheriff receiving original notification of the 1504 injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. That agency shall, 1505 within 24 hours after receiving such notification from the clerk 1506 of the court, notify the Department of Law Enforcement of such 1507 action of the court. 1508 (c)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 1509 after the court has issued a final injunction order of 1510 protection. 1511 (9)(a)âThe court may enforce a violation of a temporary or 1512 final an injunction for protection against stalking through a 1513 civil or criminal contempt proceeding, or the state attorney may 1514 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 784.0487. Any 1515 assessments or fines ordered by the court enforcing such an 1516 injunction shall be collected by the clerk of the court and 1517 transferred on a monthly basis to the State Treasury for deposit 1518 into the Domestic Violence Trust Fund. 1519 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 1520 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 784.0487, 1521 the respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the 1522 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing 1523 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with 1524 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, 1525 pending a hearing. 1526 (10)âThe petitioner or the respondent may move the court to 1527 modify or dissolve an injunction at any time. 1528 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1529 61.1825, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1530 61.1825âState Case Registry.â 1531 (3)(a)âFor the purpose of this section, a family violence 1532 indicator must be placed on a record when: 1533 1.âA party executes a sworn statement requesting that a 1534 family violence indicator be placed on that partyâs record which 1535 states that the party has reason to believe that release of 1536 information to the Federal Case Registry may result in physical 1537 or emotional harm to the party or the child; or 1538 2.âA temporary or final injunction for protection against 1539 domestic violence has been granted pursuant to s. 741.30(6), an 1540 injunction for protection against domestic violence has been 1541 issued by a court of a foreign state pursuant to s. 741.315, or 1542 a temporary or final injunction for protection against repeat 1543 violence has been granted pursuant to s. 784.046; or 1544 3.âThe department has received information on a Title IV-D 1545 case from the Statewide Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat 1546 Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System, established 1547 pursuant to s. 784.046(8)(b), that a court has granted a party a 1548 domestic violence or repeat violence injunction. 1549 Section 5.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 1550 943.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1551 943.05âCriminal Justice Information Program; duties; crime 1552 reports.â 1553 (2)âThe program shall: 1554 (e)âEstablish, implement, and maintain a Statewide Domestic 1555 and Repeat Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System 1556 capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1557 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1558 injunctions, injunctions to prevent child abuse issued under 1559 chapter 39, and repeat violence injunctions issued by the courts 1560 throughout the state. Such information must include, but is not 1561 limited to, information as to the existence and status of any 1562 such injunction for verification purposes. 1563 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1564 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1565 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 39.504, Florida 1566 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1567 39.504âInjunction; penalty.â 1568 (5)âService of process on the respondent shall be carried 1569 out pursuant to s. 741.30. The department shall deliver a copy 1570 of any injunction issued pursuant to this section to the 1571 protected party or to a parent, caregiver, or individual acting 1572 in the place of a parent who is not the respondent. Law 1573 enforcement officers may exercise their arrest powers as 1574 provided in s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 1575 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1576 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1577 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 1578 44.407, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1579 44.407âElder-focused dispute resolution process.â 1580 (3)âREFERRAL.â 1581 (b)âThe court may not refer a party who has a history of 1582 domestic violence or exploitation of an elderly person to 1583 eldercaring coordination unless the elder and other parties in 1584 the action consent to such referral. 1585 1.âThe court shall offer each party an opportunity to 1586 consult with an attorney or a domestic violence advocate before 1587 accepting consent to such referral. The court shall determine 1588 whether each party has given his or her consent freely and 1589 voluntarily. 1590 2.âThe court shall consider whether a party has committed 1591 an act of exploitation as defined in s. 415.102, exploitation of 1592 an elderly person or disabled adult as defined in s. 825.103(1), 1593 or domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 against another 1594 party or any member of another partyâs family; engaged in a 1595 pattern of behaviors that exert power and control over another 1596 party and that may compromise another partyâs ability to 1597 negotiate a fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads 1598 another party to have reasonable cause to believe that he or she 1599 is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. 1600 The court shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, 1601 including, but not limited to, the factors specified in s. 1602 741.30(6)(b). 1603 3.âIf a party has a history of domestic violence or 1604 exploitation of an elderly person, the court must order 1605 safeguards to protect the safety of the participants and the 1606 elder and the elderâs property, including, but not limited to, 1607 adherence to all provisions of an injunction for protection or 1608 conditions of bail, probation, or a sentence arising from 1609 criminal proceedings. 1610 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1611 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1612 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 1613 61.125, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1614 61.125âParenting coordination.â 1615 (4)âDOMESTIC VIOLENCE ISSUES.â 1616 (b)âIn determining whether there has been a history of 1617 domestic violence, the court shall consider whether a party has 1618 committed an act of domestic violence as defined s. 741.28, or 1619 child abuse as defined in s. 39.01, against the other party or 1620 any member of the other partyâs family; engaged in a pattern of 1621 behaviors that exert power and control over the other party and 1622 that may compromise the other partyâs ability to negotiate a 1623 fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads the other party 1624 to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent 1625 danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. The court 1626 shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, including, but 1627 not limited to, the factors listed in s. 741.30(6)(b). 1628 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1629 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1630 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 741.29, Florida 1631 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1632 741.29âDomestic violence; investigation of incidents; 1633 notice to victims of legal rights and remedies; reporting.â 1634 (1)âAny law enforcement officer who investigates an alleged 1635 incident of domestic violence shall: 1636 (a)âAssist the victim to obtain medical treatment if such 1637 is required as a result of the alleged incident to which the 1638 officer responds; 1639 (b)âAdvise the victim of such violence that there is a 1640 domestic violence center from which the victim may receive 1641 services; 1642 (c)âAdminister a lethality assessment consistent with the 1643 requirements established in subsection (2) if the allegation of 1644 domestic violence is against an intimate partner, regardless of 1645 whether an arrest is made; and 1646 (d)âGive the victim immediate notice of the legal rights 1647 and remedies available on a standard form developed and 1648 distributed by the department. As necessary, the department 1649 shall revise the Legal Rights and Remedies Notice to Victims to 1650 include a general summary of s. 741.30 using simple English as 1651 well as Spanish, and shall distribute the notice as a model form 1652 to be used by all law enforcement agencies throughout this 1653 state. The notice must include: 1654 1.âThe resource listing, including telephone number, for 1655 the area domestic violence center designated by the Department 1656 of Children and Families; and 1657 2.âA copy of the following statement: 1658 1659 IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you may 1660 ask the state attorney to file a criminal complaint. 1661 You also have the right to go to court and file a 1662 petition requesting an injunction for protection from 1663 domestic violence which may include, but need not be 1664 limited to, provisions which restrain the abuser from 1665 further acts of abuse; direct the abuser to leave your 1666 household; prevent the abuser from entering your 1667 residence, school, business, or place of employment; 1668 award you custody of your minor child or children; and 1669 direct the abuser to pay support to you and the minor 1670 children if the abuser has a legal obligation to do 1671 so. 1672 1673 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.